Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-407
Commission; meetings; notice; rules of procedure, adopt; chairperson.

The commission shall hold regular meetings at least once every three months and shall designate the time and place thereof by notice posted in the courthouse at least seven days prior to the meeting. The commission shall adopt rules of procedure and shall keep a record of its proceedings. The commission shall also make provision for special meetings, and all meetings and records of the commission shall be open to the public except as otherwise provided in the County Civil Service Commission Act. The commission shall elect one of its members as chairperson for a period of one year or until a successor has been duly elected and qualified.

Laws 1971, LB 921, § 6;

Laws 2018, LB786, § 10;

R.S.Supp.,2018, § 23-2506;

Laws 2019, LB411, § 7.